Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 1. Powers and Duties.

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1971 “lieutenant governor” was substituted for “secretary of state” in this article to conform with the 1970 amendment to the state constitution.

Administrative Code. —

For lieutenant governor, see 6 AAC, part 7.

Sec. 44.19.010.
Office of the Governor.

The Office of the Governor includes the lieutenant governor, the budget officer, and the staff that the governor finds necessary to administer the executive powers of the state.

History.

(§ 7 ch 64 SLA 1959)

Collateral references. —

38 Am. Jur. 2d, Governor, §§ 1 et seq.

63C Am. Jur. 2d, Public Officers and Employees, § 1 et seq.

72 Am. Jur. 2d, States, Territories and Dependencies, § 64.

81A C.J.S., States, §§ 73 to 75, 145 to 174, 240 to 242.

Construction and application, under state law, of doctrine of “executive privilege.” 10 ALR4th 355.

Sec. 44.19.015.
State budget.

The governor shall direct the preparation and administration of the state budget.

History.

(§ 3 ch 97 SLA 1976)

Cross references. —

For duties of the governor relating to the budget, see AS

37.07.020

.

Sec. 44.19.017.
International trade.

The Office of the Governor is authorized to foster the growth of

trade between Alaska and foreign countries; and

international trade within the state and administer Alaska foreign offices.

The governor shall maintain foreign offices, including an office located in Tokyo, Japan and Seoul, Republic of Korea. The foreign offices shall serve as outlets for information related to economic development, resources, and trade and as contact points for government and private industry of Alaska and the Pacific Rim nations of Asia and other foreign countries to promote and maintain trade between the state and those countries.

The governor shall staff the foreign offices with persons the governor selects based on their experience, training, and linguistic ability. The governor shall solicit ideas from the legislature regarding desirable staff qualifications and its recommendations of persons to staff the offices. The governor may hire additional personnel as necessary.

The governor shall direct all state agencies, and request the federal government and private industry, to provide necessary reports, brochures, and information requested by the governor.

The governor shall prepare a report annually on the activities and accomplishments of the Office of the Governor under this section and notify the legislature that the report is available.

The expenses of operating the activities of the Office of the Governor under this section, including its foreign offices, shall be included in appropriations made to the Office of the Governor.

History.

(E.O. No. 112, § 2 (2004))

Sec. 44.19.020.
Duties of the lieutenant governor.

The lieutenant governor shall

administer state election laws;

appoint notaries public;

adopt regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) that establish for the broadcasting of notices under AS

44.62.190

and

44.62.310(e)

the frequency of the broadcasts, appropriate broadcast times, and the locations for the broadcasts; the regulations must be reasonably calculated to provide the widest possible exposure of the notices.

History.

(§ 7 ch 64 SLA 1959; am § 5 ch 74 SLA 1991)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

44.19.030

. Renumbered in 1980. Former AS

44.19.020

, relating to the Pioneers’ Home, was repealed by E.O. No. 30 (1968).

Cross references. —

For election laws, see AS 15; for notaries public, see AS 44.50.

Administrative Code. —

For broadcasting of certain public notices, see 6 AAC 90.

Sec. 44.19.022.
Custodian of state seal.

The lieutenant governor is the custodian of the state seal.

History.

(§ 7 ch 64 SLA 1959)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

44.19.040

. Renumbered in 1980.

Sec. 44.19.023.
State museum management. [Repealed, E.O. No. 34 (1974).]

Sec. 44.19.024.
Fees for issuing certificate.

For issuing each certificate with the seal of the state affixed, the lieutenant governor shall collect a fee of $5 for each certificate.

History.

(§ 6-1-7 ACLA 1949; am § 6 ch 60 SLA 2005)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

44.19.045

. Renumbered in 1980.

Sec. 44.19.025.
[Renumbered as AS 44.99.001.]

Sec. 44.19.026.
Designation of temporary substitute for lieutenant governor.

The lieutenant governor may designate a head of a principal executive department, or more than one such officer in the alternative, who shall temporarily be custodian of the state seal and perform the authenticating functions of the lieutenant governor during such time as the lieutenant governor succeeds to the office of governor, acts as governor, is absent from the state, or otherwise is not available at the state capital to perform the above authenticating functions. The designation shall be in writing, signed by the lieutenant governor, and filed in the office of the lieutenant governor. The designation is effective until revoked by a later designation executed and filed in the same manner.

History.

(§ 1 ch 22 SLA 1962)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.19.050. Renumbered in 1980.

Sec. 44.19.027.
Emergency assistance transportation.

If the governor determines that public safety or health conditions in an area of the state require emergency assistance, the governor may use state-owned and state-operated transportation facilities, aircraft, vessels of the Alaska marine highway system, or railroad rolling stock of the Alaska Railroad to deliver compassionate aid for distribution to the affected area, including food, water, fuel, clothing, medicine, and other supplies provided by nonprofit organizations.

History.

(§ 1 ch 40 SLA 2010)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 44.19.051. Renumbered in 2010.

Sec. 44.19.028.
Interim boards.

The governor may establish the interim advisory boards, councils, and commissions the governor considers necessary. The governor may prescribe the functions and authority of interim boards, councils, and commissions and fix the compensation of their members.
An interim board, council, or commission remains in existence only until the adjournment of the next regular or reconvened session of the legislature.

History.

(§ 20 ch 64 SLA 1959; am § 95 ch 59 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.19.060. Renumbered in 1980.

Sec. 44.19.030.
Printing governor’s message.

The governor shall have the governor’s message printed and distributed to each member of the legislature within 24 hours after it is delivered or with all possible speed.

History.

(§ 5-1-6 ACLA 1949)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

44.19.070

. Renumbered in 1980. Also in 1980, former AS

44.19.030

was renumbered as AS

44.19.020

.

Sec. 44.19.035.
Jones Act repeal.

The governor shall use best efforts and all appropriate means to persuade the United States Congress to repeal those provisions of the Jones Act formerly codified at 46 U.S.C. 861, et seq.

History.

(1983 Initiative Proposal No. 2, § 4; am § 22 ch 126 SLA 1994; am § 47 ch 40 SLA 2008)

Cross references. —

For current federal law, see 46 U.S.C. 50101 et seq.